Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 7. Waterworks Franchises

§ 15-7-701.
Authority to construct; rights of operator; limitations; applicability.

The governing body of any city or town may grant the right to construct, maintain and operate a system of waterworks within the corporate limits of the city or town to any corporation organized under the laws of Wyoming for that purpose. Subject to the supervision and control of the governing body, the corporation acquiring a right or franchise to construct waterworks may use the streets and alleys within the corporate limits to put down and operate all pipes, hydrants and other appliances necessary to the complete operation of the works.

However, the governing body shall not grant a franchise:

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 176, § 1.

For more than twenty (20) years at any one time.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 176, § 1.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to restrict, prohibit or otherwise affect the rights of the University of Wyoming under W.S.

21-17-126

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 473; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-473; W.S. 1977, §§ 15-7-480, 15-7-486, 15-7-487; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2007, ch. 176, § 1; 2021 ch. 93, § 2, effective April 5, 2021.

Cross references. —

For authority of water and ditch company to issue bonds, see §

17-12-105

.

As to drinking water standards, see §§

35-4-220

to

35-4-224

.

For general state law relative to water, see title 41.

The 2007 amendment

repealed former (b)(i), which read: “Until the question has been submitted to the voters of the city or town and approved by a majority thereof casting votes at the election”; repealed former (c), which read: “Any election on the question of granting a franchise shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 23 of the Wyoming Election Code of 1973, as amended.”

Laws 2007, ch. 176, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

The 2021 amendment

added (d).

Laws 2021, ch. 93, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

§ 15-7-702.
Supplying water; contract; time limitation.

The governing body may enter into a contract with the corporation to supply the city or town with water for protection from fire, the sprinkling of streets and for other purposes necessary to the health and safety of the city or town. The contract shall not be for more than ten (10) years at any one time and as agreed upon by the parties.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 474; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-474; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-481; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-703.
Supplying water; charges; revision; time period; collection.

The corporation receiving the franchise to construct and maintain waterworks shall establish a schedule of prices to be charged for the use of water by consumers. The governing body shall revise or amend the schedule, if necessary, so that the charges are not unreasonable or oppressive. In establishing the water rates the governing body shall take into consideration the cost of construction of the water plant and adjust the rates to be charged upon a basis equitable to all parties. The schedule of prices agreed upon by the governing body are the prices that the corporation may charge and receive for the use of water within the corporate limits. The schedule of prices when fixed is not subject to revision more often than once every two (2) years without the permission of the corporation. The governing body has full authority to collect all water rents and charges due from consumers.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 475; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-475; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-482; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-704.
Extension of system and jurisdiction.

The corporation constructing the waterworks may extend it beyond the corporate limits of the city or town. For the purpose of maintaining and protecting the system from injury and the water from pollution, the jurisdiction of the city or town extends over the entire territory occupied by the works.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 476; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-476; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-483; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-705.
Right to purchase.

The franchise granting the privilege to any corporation to construct and maintain waterworks, shall contain the express condition that the city or town has the right to purchase the waterworks and the franchise with all appurtenances, within twenty (20) years from the date of the franchise, upon reasonable terms agreed upon by the contracting parties.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 477; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-477; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-484; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Municipal water right not acquirable by adverse use. —

Where municipal corporation acquired right by prior appropriation to use of waters of stream for municipal and domestic purposes, junior appropriator cannot acquire any part of it as against municipality by adverse use. Holt v. Cheyenne, 22 Wyo. 212, 137 P. 876,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1914).

§ 15-7-706.
Right to appropriate and condemn.

The corporation to which the right or franchise is granted may acquire by appropriation all surplus water in any stream, purchase prior water rights and hold and use the water so acquired for the purposes of the corporation. It may also obtain the right-of-way and lands necessary for reservoirs for the water system. The laws of Wyoming relative to condemnation apply as if they were set forth in this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 478; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-478; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-485; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to eminent domain generally, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

and Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

§ 15-7-707.
Ordinances authorized; rights preserved.

The governing body may pass all ordinances necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

The powers conferred upon a city or town by this article do not deprive them of any rights or powers conferred upon them by other laws.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 481, 482; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-481, 15.1-482; W.S. 1977, §§ 15-7-488, 15-7-489; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-708.
Existing franchises validated.

All franchises previously granted by the governing body of any city or town for supplying water are valid.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 483; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-483; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-490; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.